Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6407.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16207. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), a licensee or registrant shall furnish the department with satisfactory evidence that, during the license or registration cycle immediately preceding the licensee's or registrant's application for renewal, the licensee or registrant has completed an appropriate number of hours of training on implicit bias, as determined by the department. (2) The training required under this section must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) Trauma-informed approaches to care. (b) Anti-stigma education on physical, cognitive, and developmental disabilities and behavioral health conditions. (3) The department may promulgate rules to implement this section. (4) This section does not apply to an individual who is licensed under part 188. (5) As used in this section, "implicit bias" means an attitude or stereotype that affects an individual's perception, action, or decision making in an unconscious manner and that often contributes to unequal treatment of an individual based on race, ethnicity, nationality, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, religion, socioeconomic status, age, disability, trauma, condition, or other characteristic.